Hawaii, session 2026, SB816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State is home to a diverse population, with a significant portion of its residents being immigrants or individuals from mixed-status families.  According to the United States Census Bureau, approximately eighteen per cent of the State's population is foreign-born.  According to the American Immigration Council, nearly eight per cent of the State's population are United States-born residents living with at least one immigrant parent. The legislature further finds that many foreign-born residents face challenges navigating complex immigration proceedings in immigration court without legal representation.  Language barriers, financial constraints, and lack of accessible legal resources exacerbate these challenges. The legislature also finds that individuals facing deportation or other immigration-related proceedings in immigration court lack the right to government-funded legal representation, leaving them to navigate complex legal systems alone unless they retain costly counsel or other assistance on their own.  Unaccompanied minors and deferred action for childhood arrivals immigrants, who are the most vulnerable, face immigration proceedings in immigration court, often without representation.  Studies have shown that individuals with legal representation are significantly more likely to achieve favorable outcomes in immigration proceedings in immigration court, including relief from deportation or the ability to remain with their families. The purpose of this Act is to establish a program to provide access for legal representation to individuals in the State facing immigration-related proceedings in immigration court, ensuring due process and promoting family unity, community stability, and economic security. SECTION 2.  Chapter 601, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part     .  Due process in immigration proceedings program §601-     Due process in immigration proceedings program; establishment.  (a)  There is established the due process in immigration proceedings program.  The judiciary shall administer funding for the program and contract with nonprofit organizations, legal service providers, and other entities to implement and operate the program and provide program services. (b)  The purpose of the due process in immigration proceedings program shall be to provide legal representation to individuals residing in the State who are facing immigration-related proceedings in immigration court, regardless of their ability to pay. (c)  The judiciary shall issue requests for proposals to select and contract with nonprofit organizations, legal service providers, and other entities to implement and operate the due process in immigration proceedings program. §601-     Powers and duties.  In the administration of the due process in immigration proceedings program, the judiciary shall ensure that the entities contracted to implement and operate the program: (1)  Provide legal representation to individuals in immigration-related proceedings in immigration court, including deportation defense, asylum applications, and other immigration relief processes; (2)  Prioritize services for individuals who are detained, at risk of deportation, or otherwise vulnerable due to their immigration status; (3)  Partner with community-based organizations and legal service providers to ensure culturally and linguistically appropriate services; (4)  Provide training and education for, or partner with entities capable of training and educating, law students and legal practitioners to provide legal representation to individuals in immigration-related proceedings in immigration court, including but not limited to deportation defense, asylum applications, and other immigration relief processes; (5)  Conduct outreach and education to inform impacted communities about the availability of legal representation and related resources; and (6)  Collect and report data on the program's outcomes, including the number of individuals served, types of cases handled, length of time each case has been pending, and success rates, while maintaining confidentiality and protecting sensitive information. §601-     Eligibility.  The judiciary shall establish eligibility criteria for the due process in immigration proceedings program, which shall require that each participating individual: (1)  Is a resident of the State; and (2)  Receives an income that is at or below two hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty level for the State; provided that an exception may be made for any individual facing extraordinary circumstances. §601-     Annual report.  (a) The judiciary shall submit an annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. (b)  The annual report shall include: (1)  The number of individuals served by the due process in immigration proceedings program; (2)  The types of cases handled; (3)  The outcomes of the cases; (4)  The length of time each case has been pending; and (5)  Recommendations for improving access to legal representation for individuals in immigration-related proceedings in immigration court. (c)  The judiciary shall require entities contracted to implement and operate the program to provide to the judiciary information necessary for the report." SECTION 3.  Chapter 601, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by designating sections 601-1 to 601-21 as part I, entitled "General Provisions". SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and administration of the due process in immigration proceedings program, including funding for legal service providers, outreach efforts, and administrative costs. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.